Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6213.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-22.2-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-22.2 entitled "Rhode
Island Comprehensive Planning and Land Use Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-22.2-4. Definitions.
As used in this chapter the following words have the meanings stated herein:
(1) “Agricultural land” means land suitable for agriculture by reason of suitability of soil
or other natural characteristics or past use for agricultural purposes.
(2) “Capacity” or “land capacity” means the suitability of the land, as defined by geology,
soil conditions, topography, and water resources, to support its development for uses such as
residential, commercial, industrial, open space, or recreation. Land capacity may be modified by
provision of facilities and services.
(3) “Capital improvements program” means a proposed schedule of all future projects
listed in order of construction priority together with cost estimates and the anticipated means of
financing each project.
(4) “Chief” means the highest-ranking administrative officer of the division of planning as
established by § 42-11-10(g).
(5) “Coastal features” means any coastal beach, barrier island or spit, coastal wetland,
coastal headland, bluff or cliff, rocky shore, manmade shoreline or dune as outlined and defined by
the coastal resources management program, and as may be amended.

(6) “Comprehensive plan” or “comprehensive land use plan” means a document containing
the components described in this chapter, including the implementation program which is
consistent with the goals and guidelines established by this chapter.
(7) “Days” means calendar days.
(8) “Division of planning” means the office established as a division of the department of
administration by § 42-11-10(g).
(9) “Floodplains” or “flood hazard area” means an area that is subject to a flood from a
storm having a one percent (1%) chance of being equaled or exceeded in any given year, as
delineated on a community’s flood hazard map as approved by the federal emergency management
agency pursuant to the National Flood Insurance Act of 1968, as amended (Pub. L. No. 90-448),
42 U.S.C. § 4011 et seq.
(10) “Forecast” means a description of the conditions, quantities, or values anticipated to
occur at a designated future time.
(11) “Goals” means those goals stated in § 45-22.2-3.
(12) “Historic or cultural resource” means any real property, structure, natural object,
place, landmark, landscape, archaeological site or configuration or any portion or group of the
preceding which has been listed on the federal or state register of historic places or that is
considered by the Rhode Island Historical Preservation & Heritage Commission to meet the
eligibility criteria for listing on the state register of historic places pursuant to § 42-45-5 or is located
in a historic district established by a municipality in accordance with chapter 24.1 of this title,
Historic Area Zoning.
(13) “Land” means real property including improvements and fixtures on, above, or below
the surface.
(14) “Land use regulation” means a rule or statute of general application adopted by the
municipal legislative body which controls, directs, or delineates allowable uses of land and the
standards for these uses.
(15) “Local government” means any governmental agency authorized by this chapter to
exercise the power granted by this chapter.
(16) “Maintain” means to evaluate regularly and revise as needed or required in order to
ensure that a comprehensive plan remains consistent with the goals and guidelines established by
this chapter.
(17) “Municipal legislative body” means the town council in a town or the city council in
a city; or that part of a municipal government that exercises legislative powers under a statute or
charter.
LC002697 - Page 2 of 5

(18) “Municipal reviewing authority” means the municipal planning board or commission.
(19) “Open space” means any parcel or area of land or water set aside, dedicated,
designated, or reserved for public or private use or enjoyment or for the use and enjoyment of
owners and occupants of land adjoining or neighboring the open space; provided that the area may
be improved with only those buildings, structures, streets, and off-street parking, and other
improvements that are designed to be incidental to the natural openness of the land.
(20) "Overlay district" mean a district established in a zoning ordinance that is
superimposed on one or more districts or parts of districts. The standards and requirements
associated with an overlay district may be more or less restrictive than those in the underlying
districts consistent with other applicable state and federal laws.
(20)(21) “Planning board” or “commission” means the body established by a municipality
under chapter 22 of this title or combination of municipalities which has the responsibility to
prepare a comprehensive plan and make recommendations concerning that plan to the municipal
legislative body.
(21)(22) “State guide plan” means goals, policies, and plans or plan elements for the
physical, economic, and social development of the state, adopted by the state planning council in
accordance with § 42-11-10.
(22)(23) “State or regional agency” means, for the purposes of this chapter, any state
agency, department, public authority, public corporation, organization, commission, or other
governing body with regulatory or other authority affecting the goals established either in this
chapter or the state guide plan. Pursuant to § 45-22.2-2, the definition of state and regional agency
shall not be construed to supersede or diminish any regulatory authority granted by state or federal
statute.
(23)(24) “State agency program or project” State agency program means any non-
regulatory, coordinated group of activities implemented for the purpose of achieving a specific goal
or objective. State agency project means a specific initiative or development on an identifiable
parcel(s) of land.
(24)(25) “Voluntary association of local governments” means two (2) or more
municipalities that have joined together pursuant to a written agreement and pursuant to the
authority granted under this chapter for the purpose of drafting a comprehensive land use plan and
implementation program.
(26) "Watershed" means a land area which because of its topography, soil type, and
drainage patterns acts as a collector of raw waters which regorge or replenish rivers and existing or
planned public water supplies.
LC002697 - Page 3 of 5

(27) "Watershed overlay protection district" means a zoning designation that applies a
specific set of rules, often stricter than those in the underlying zoning district, to protect water
resources within a watershed.
(25)(28) “Wetland” a marsh, swamp, bog, pond, river, river or stream flood plain or bank;
an area subject to flooding or storm flowage; an emergent or submergent plant community in any
body of fresh water; or an area within fifty feet (50′) of the edge of a bog, marsh, swamp, or pond,
as defined in § 2-1-20; or any salt marsh bordering on the tidal waters of this state, whether or not
the tidal waters reach the littoral areas through natural or artificial watercourses, and those uplands
directly associated and contiguous thereto which are necessary to preserve the integrity of that
marsh, and as further defined by the RI coastal resources management program, as may be
amended.
(26)(29) “Zoning” means the reservation of certain specified areas within a community or
city for building and structures, or use of land, for certain purposes with other limitations as height,
lot coverage, and other stipulated requirements.
SECTION 2. Chapter 45-53 of the General Laws entitled "Low and Moderate Income
Housing" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-53-11.1. Comprehensive permits prohibited in watershed overlay protection
districts in Tiverton.
In the town of Tiverton, no applications shall be issued, authorized or permitted for a
comprehensive permit under the Rhode Island comprehensive planning and land use regulation act
pursuant to chapter 22.2 of title 45 in any watershed overlay protection district, as defined in § 45-
22.2-4.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002697
========
LC002697 - Page 4 of 5